Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 13.1-1000.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the Virginia Limited Liability Company Act.

History.

1991, c. 168.

Law Review.

For article, “The Virginia Limited Liability Company Act,” see 25 U. Rich. L. Rev. 789 (1991).

For comment, “The Dawn of the Limited Liability Company In Virginia: An Analysis of the Statute,” see 14 G.M.U. L. Rev. 177 (1992).

For a review of corporate law in Virginia for year 1999, see 33 U. Rich. L. Rev. 841 (1999).

For 2000 survey of Virginia corporate and business law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 697 (2000).

For article reviewing changes in Virginia corporate and business law from June 2001 through May 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (2002).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4B M.J. Corporations, § 2; 12A M.J. Limited Liability Companies, §§ 3-5, 29, 39, 47-56.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Fiduciary duties. —

Absence of language defining fiduciary duties among limited liability company (LLC) members in the Virginia Limited Liability Company Act (LLC Act), §

13.1-1000

et seq., is intentional; the Virginia general assembly’s express imposition of fiduciary duties among partners in a partnership under subsection A of §

50-73.102

, demonstrates that the general assembly is conscious of the language needed to impose fiduciary duties if desired, and the decision to omit similar duty-imposing language in the LLC Act is clear evidence that the general assembly intends that LLC members owe no fiduciary duty to other LLC members. WAKA, LLC v. Humphrey, 73 Va. Cir. 310, 2007 Va. Cir. LEXIS 96 (Fairfax County May 2, 2007).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Taxation of single member limited liability companies. —

Property that is owned by a single member limited liability company that does not independently qualify as an “institution of learning not conducted for profit” is not eligible for tax exemption by classification under subdivision A 4 of §

58.1-3606

, notwithstanding that the sole owner of the entity is a non-profit corporation operating as an institution of learning.
See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Philip J. Kellam, Commissioner of the Revenue for Virginia Beach,
18-027,
(8/9/19).

Certain receipts, including gifts and contributions, of a domestic single member limited liability company (SMLLC) that is classified as a disregarded entity for federal income tax purposes and solely owned by a charitable organization that qualifies for charitable deductions under the Internal Revenue Code, may be excluded from business, professional and occupational license (BPOL) taxation, if applicable requirements of subdivision C 18 of §

58.1-3703

have been satisfied. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Philip J. Kellam, Commissioner of the Revenue for Virginia Beach,
18-027,
(8/9/19).

§ 13.1-1001.
Reservation of power to amend or repeal.

The General Assembly shall have the power to amend or repeal all or part of this chapter at any time and all domestic and foreign limited liability companies subject to this chapter shall be governed by the amendment or repeal.

History.

1991, c. 168.

§ 13.1-1001.1.
Construction.

Unless displaced by particular provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and equity supplement this chapter.

Sections 9-406 and 9-408 of the Uniform Commercial Code, including §§

8.9A-406

and

8.9A-408

, do not apply to any interest in a limited liability company, including all rights, powers and interests arising under the articles of organization or operating agreement of a limited liability company or this chapter. This provision prevails over §§

8.9A-406

and

8.9A-408

, and is expressly intended to permit the enforcement as a fundamental matter of contract among the members of a limited liability company of any provision of an operating agreement that would otherwise be ineffective under § 9-406 or § 9-408 of the Uniform Commercial Code.

This chapter shall be construed in furtherance of the policies of giving maximum effect to the principle of freedom of contract and of enforcing operating agreements.

History.

1993, c. 113; 2003, c. 340.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 340, effective July 1, 2003, designated the first paragraph as subsection A and added subsections B and C.

§ 13.1-1002.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Articles of organization”
means all documents constituting, at any particular time, the articles of organization of a limited liability company. The articles of organization include the original articles of organization, the original certificate of organization issued by the Commission, and all amendments to the articles of organization. When the articles of organization have been restated pursuant to any articles of restatement, amendment, domestication, or merger, the articles of organization include only the restated articles of organization without the articles of restatement, amendment, domestication, or merger.

“Assignee”
means a person to which all or part of a membership interest has been transferred, whether or not the transferor is a member.

“Bankruptcy”
means, with respect to any person, being the subject of an order for relief under Title 11 of the United States Code.

“Commission”
means the State Corporation Commission of Virginia.

“Contribution”
means any cash, property or services rendered, or a promissory note or other binding obligation to contribute cash or property or to perform services, which a member contributes to a limited liability company in his capacity as a member.

“Distribution”
means a direct or indirect transfer of money or other property, or incurrence of indebtedness by a limited liability company, to or for the benefit of its members in respect of their interests.

“Domestic,”
with respect to an entity, means an entity governed as to its internal affairs by the organic law of the Commonwealth.

“Domestic business trust”
has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-1201

.

“Domestic corporation”
has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-603

.

“Domestic limited partnership”
has the same meaning as specified in §

50-73.1

.

“Domestic nonstock corporation”
has the same meaning as “domestic corporation” as specified in §

13.1-803

.

“Domestic partnership”
means an association of two or more persons to carry on as co-owners a business for profit formed under §

50-73.88

, or predecessor law of the Commonwealth, and includes, for all purposes of the laws of the Commonwealth, a registered limited liability partnership.

“Domestic stock corporation”
has the same meaning as “domestic corporation” as specified in §

13.1-603

.

“Effective date,”
when referring to a document for which effectiveness is contingent upon issuance of a certificate by the Commission, means the time and date determined in accordance with §

13.1-1004

.

“Electronic transmission”
means any form of communication, not directly involving the physical transmission of paper, that creates a record that may be retained, retrieved, and reviewed by a recipient thereof, and that may be directly reproduced in paper form by the recipient through an automated process. Any term used in this definition that is defined in § 59.1-480 of the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act (§ 59.1-479 et seq.) shall have the meaning set forth in that section.

“Eligible interests”
means, as to a partnership, partnership interest as specified in §

50-73.79

; as to a limited partnership, partnership interest as specified in §

50-73.1

; as to a business trust, the beneficial interest of a beneficial owner as specified in §

13.1-1226

; as to a stock corporation, shares as specified in §

13.1-603

; or, as to a nonstock corporation, membership interest as specified in §

13.1-803

.

“Entity”
includes any domestic or foreign limited liability company, any domestic or foreign other business entity, any estate or trust, and any state, the United States, and any foreign government.

“Entity conversion”
means conversion. A certificate of entity conversion is the same as a certificate of conversion.

“Foreign,”
with respect to an entity, means an entity governed as to its internal affairs by the organic law of a jurisdiction other than the Commonwealth.

“Foreign business trust”
has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-1201

.

“Foreign corporation”
has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-603

.

“Foreign limited liability company”
means an entity, excluding a foreign business trust, that is an unincorporated organization that is organized under laws other than the laws of the Commonwealth and that is denominated by that law as a limited liability company, and that affords to each of its members, pursuant to the laws under which it is organized, limited liability with respect to the liabilities of the entity.

“Foreign limited partnership”
has the same meaning as specified in §

50-73.1

.

“Foreign nonstock corporation”
has the same meaning as “foreign corporation” as specified in §

13.1-803

.

“Foreign partnership”
means an association of two or more persons to carry on as co-owners a business for profit formed under the laws of any state or jurisdiction other than the Commonwealth, and includes, for all purposes of the laws of the Commonwealth, a foreign registered limited liability partnership.

“Foreign protected series”
means a protected series established by a foreign series limited liability company and having attributes comparable to a protected series established under Article 16 (§

13.1-1088

et seq.). The term applies whether or not the law under which the foreign series limited liability company is organized refers to “protected series” or “series.”

“Foreign registered limited liability partnership”
has the same meanings as specified in §§ 50-2 and

50-73.79

.

“Foreign series limited liability company”
means a foreign limited liability company having at least one foreign protected series.

“Foreign stock corporation”
has the same meaning as “foreign corporation” as specified in §

13.1-603

.

“Jurisdiction,”
when used to refer to a political entity, means the United States, a state, a foreign country, or a political subdivision of a foreign country.

“Jurisdiction of formation”
means the state or country the law of which includes the organic law governing a domestic or foreign limited liability company or other business entity.

“Limited liability company”
or

“domestic limited liability company”

means an entity that is an unincorporated organization organized and existing under this chapter, or that has become a domestic limited liability company of the Commonwealth pursuant to § 13.1-1010.3 as it existed prior to its repeal, even though also being a non-United States entity organized under laws other than the laws of the Commonwealth, or that has become a domestic limited liability company of the Commonwealth pursuant to § 56-1, even though also being a non-United States entity organized under laws other than the laws of the Commonwealth, or that has become a domestic limited liability company of the Commonwealth pursuant to §

13.1-1010.1

as it existed prior to its repeal, or that has become a domestic limited liability company of the Commonwealth pursuant to Article 12.2 (§

13.1-722.8

et seq.) of Chapter 9, Article 17.1 (§

13.1-944.1

et seq.) of Chapter 10, Article 14 (§

13.1-1074

et seq.) or Article 15 (§

13.1-1081

et seq.) of this chapter, or Article 12 (§

13.1-1264

et seq.) of Chapter 14. A limited liability company’s status for federal tax purposes shall not affect its status as a distinct entity organized and existing under this chapter.

“Manager”
or

“managers”

means a person or persons designated by the members of a limited liability company to manage the limited liability company as provided in the articles of organization or an operating agreement.

“Manager-managed limited liability company”
means a limited liability company that is managed by a manager or managers as provided for in its articles of organization or an operating agreement.

“Member”
means a person that has been admitted to membership in a limited liability company as provided in §

13.1-1038.1

and that has not ceased to be a member.

“Member-managed limited liability company”
means a limited liability company that is not a manager-managed limited liability company.

“Membership interest”
or

“interest”

means a member’s share of the profits and the losses of the limited liability company and the right to receive distributions of the limited liability company’s assets.

“Non-United States entity”
means a foreign limited liability company (other than one formed under the laws of a state), or a corporation, business trust or association, real estate investment trust, common-law trust, or any other unincorporated business, including a partnership, formed, incorporated, organized, created or that otherwise came into being under the laws of any foreign country or other foreign jurisdiction (other than any state).

“Operating agreement”
means an agreement of the members as to the affairs of a limited liability company and the conduct of its business, or a writing or agreement of a limited liability company with one member that satisfies the requirements of subdivision A 2 of §

13.1-1023

.

“Organic law”
means the statute governing the internal affairs of a domestic or foreign limited liability company or other business entity.

“Organization surrender”
has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-1074

. A certificate of organization surrender is the same as a certificate of domestication.

“Other business entity”
means a domestic or foreign partnership, limited partnership, business trust, stock corporation, or nonstock corporation.

“Person”
has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-603

. “Person” includes a protected series.

“Principal office”
means the office, in or out of the Commonwealth, where the principal executive offices of a domestic or foreign limited liability company are located or, if there are no such offices, the office, in or out of the Commonwealth, so designated by the limited liability company. The designation of the principal office in the most recent statement of change filed pursuant to §

13.1-1018.1

shall be conclusive for the purpose of this chapter.

“Property”
means all property, whether real, personal, or mixed or tangible or intangible, or any right or interest therein.

“Protected series,”
except in the term “foreign protected series,” means a person established under §

13.1-1095

.

“Record,”
when used as a noun, means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“Registered limited liability partnership”
has the same meaning as specified in §

50-73.79

.

“Series limited liability company,”
except in the term “foreign series limited liability company,” means a limited liability company having at least one protected series.

“Sign”
means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record, to execute or adopt a tangible symbol or to attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process.

“State,”
when referring to a part of the United States, includes a state, commonwealth and the District of Columbia, and their agencies and governmental subdivisions; and a territory or insular possession, and their agencies and governmental subdivisions, of the United States.

“Transfer”
includes an assignment, a conveyance, a sale, a lease, an encumbrance including a mortgage or security interest, a gift, and a transfer by operation of law.

“United States”
includes a district, authority, bureau, commission, department, and any other agency of the United States.

History.

1991, c. 168; 1992, cc. 574, 575; 1993, c. 113; 1995, c. 168; 1996, c. 265; 1997, c. 190; 2001, c. 548; 2002, cc. 288, 621; 2003, c. 340; 2005, c. 255; 2006, c. 912; 2007, cc. 233, 639; 2009, cc. 450, 763; 2016, c. 288; 2019, c. 636; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487; 2022, c. 82.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 636, effective July 1, 2021, inserted the definitions of “Assignee,” “Foreign protected series,” “Foreign series limited liability company,” “Jurisdiction,” “Jurisdiction of formation,” “Property,” “Protected series,” “Record,” “Series limited liability company,” “Sign,” and “Transfer”; and in the definition for “Person,” added the second sentence.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, added “unless the context requires a different meaning” in the introductory language; inserted the definitions of “Domestic,” “Effective date,” “Entity,” “Foreign,” “Organic law,” “Other business entity,” and “Registered limited liability partnership”; deleted the definitions of “Domestic other business entity” and “Foreign other business entity”; in the definition of “Jurisdiction of formation,” substituted “state or country the law of which includes the organic law governing a domestic or foreign limited liability company or other business entity” for “jurisdiction whose law governs the internal affairs of a person.” For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 82 added the definitions of “Entity conversion” and “Organization surrender.”

§ 13.1-1003.
Filing requirements.

A document shall satisfy the requirements of this section, and of any other section that adds to or varies these requirements, to be entitled to be filed with the Commission.

The document shall be one that this chapter requires or permits to be filed with the Commission.

The document shall contain the information required by this chapter. It may contain other information as well.

The document shall be typewritten or printed or, if electronically transmitted, shall be in a format that can be retrieved or reproduced in typewritten or printed form. The typewritten or printed portion shall be in black. Photocopies, or other reproduced copies, of typewritten or printed documents may be filed. In every case, information in the document shall be legible and the document shall be capable of being reformatted and reproduced in copies of archival quality.

The document shall be in the English language. A limited liability company name need not be in English if written in English letters or Arabic or Roman numerals. The articles of organization, duly authenticated by the official having custody of the applicable records in the state or country under whose law the limited liability company is formed, which are required of foreign limited liability companies, need not be in English if accompanied by a reasonably authenticated English translation.

The document shall be signed in the name of the domestic or foreign limited liability company:

By any manager or other person who has been delegated the right and power to manage the business and affairs of the limited liability company, or if no managers or such other persons have been selected, by any member of the limited liability company;

If the limited liability company has not been formed, or has been formed without any managers or members and no members have been admitted, by an organizer;

In the case of a foreign limited liability company, by a person who is authorized to sign an amendment to the articles of organization or other constituent documents delivered for filing to the Secretary of State or other official having custody of limited liability company records in the state or other jurisdiction under whose law it is formed; or

If the limited liability company is in the hands of a receiver, trustee, or other court-appointed fiduciary, by that fiduciary.

The person executing the document shall sign it and state beneath or opposite his signature his name and the capacity in which he signs. Any signature may be a facsimile.

If, pursuant to any provision of this chapter, the Commission has prescribed a mandatory form for the document, the document shall be in or on the prescribed form.

The document shall be delivered to the Commission for filing and shall be accompanied by the required filing fee and any registration fee required by this chapter.

The Commission may accept the electronic filing of any information required or permitted to be filed by this chapter and may prescribe the methods of execution, recording, reproduction and certification of electronically filed information pursuant to § 59.1-496.

History.

1991, c. 168; 1995, c. 70; 2000, cc. 58, 995; 2003, cc. 340, 379; 2006, c. 748; 2013, c. 17.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 58, in subdivision F 1, inserted “or other person who has been delegated the right and power to manage the business and affairs of the limited liability company,” and “or such other persons.”

The 2000 amendment by c. 995 added “pursuant to § 59.1-496” to subsection J.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 340 and 379, effective July 1, 2003, are identical, and substituted “or has been formed without any members and no members have been admitted, by one or more of the persons forming or who formed” for “by the person forming” in subdivision F 2.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 748 added the language beginning “or, if electronically transmitted” to the end of the first sentence in subsection D; and in subdivision F 2, inserted “managers or” and substituted “an organizer” for “one or more of the persons forming or who formed the limited liability company.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 17, in subsection F, substituted “shall be signed in the name of the domestic or foreign limited” for “shall be executed in the name of the limited,” added subdivision F 3 and redesignated former subdivision F 3 as F 4, and made related changes.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia corporate and business law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 697 (2000).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12A M.J. Limited Liability Companies, §§ 8, 44.

§ 13.1-1003.1.
Filings with the Commission pursuant to reorganization.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in §

13.1-1003

,

13.1-1011

,

13.1-1014

,

13.1-1014.1

,

13.1-1050

,

13.1-1072

, or

13.1-1085

, whenever, pursuant to any applicable statute of the United States relating to reorganizations of limited liability companies, a plan of reorganization of a limited liability company has been confirmed by the decree or order of a court of competent jurisdiction, the limited liability company may put into effect and carry out the plan and decrees of the court relative thereto (i) through one or more amendments to the limited liability company’s articles of organization containing terms and conditions permitted by this chapter; (ii) through a plan of merger or entity conversion; or (iii) through cancellation, without action by the managers or members, to carry out the plan of reorganization decreed or ordered by the court of competent jurisdiction under federal statute.

The individual or individuals designated by the court shall deliver to the Commission for filing articles of amendment, restatement, merger, entity conversion, or cancellation, which, in addition to the matters otherwise required or permitted by law to be set forth therein, shall set forth:

The name of the limited liability company;

Any provision relating to the amendment or amendments, plan of merger or entity conversion, or cancellation approved by the court;

The name of the court and the date of the court’s order or decree approving the amendment, plan of merger or entity conversion, or cancellation;

The title and case number, if any, of the reorganization proceeding in which the order or decree was entered; and

A statement that the court had jurisdiction of the proceeding under federal statute.

If the Commission finds that the articles of amendment, restatement, merger, entity conversion, or cancellation comply with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall issue a certificate of amendment, restatement, merger, entity conversion, or cancellation.

This section does not apply after entry of a final decree in the reorganization proceeding even though the court retains jurisdiction of the proceeding for limited purposes unrelated to consummation of the reorganization plan.

History.

2016, c. 288.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 288, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, before the effective date of this act with respect to (i) the conversion of a domestic or foreign partnership or limited partnership to a limited liability company or (ii) the domestication of a non-United States entity as a limited liability company.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 3 provides: “That until July 1, 2023, the term ‘incorporation surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 10 (§

13.1-801

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia, the term ‘organization surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 12 (§

13.1-1000

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia, and the term ‘trust surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 14 (§

13.1-1200

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia shall also be construed to mean ‘domestication,’ and the term ‘entity conversion’ when used in any provision of Chapter 10, 12, or 14 of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia shall also be construed to mean ‘conversion.’ ”

§ 13.1-1004.
Issuance of certificate by Commission; recordation of documents.

Whenever this chapter conditions the effectiveness of a document upon the issuance of a certificate by the Commission to evidence the effectiveness of the document, the Commission shall by order issue the certificate if it finds that the document complies with the provisions of this chapter and that all required fees have been paid. The Commission shall admit any such certificate to record in its office.

The existence of a limited liability company or a protected series shall begin at the time the Commission issues a certificate of organization or certificate of protected series designation unless a later date and time are specified as provided by subsection D. The certificate of organization shall be conclusive evidence that all conditions precedent required to be performed by the person(s) forming the limited liability company have been complied with and that the limited liability company has been formed under this chapter.

Whenever the Commission is directed to admit any document to record in its office, it shall cause it to be spread upon its record books or to be recorded or reproduced in any other manner the Commission may deem suitable. Except as otherwise provided by law, the Commission may furnish information from and provide access to any of its records by any means the Commission may deem suitable.

A certificate issued by the Commission is effective at the time such certificate is issued, unless the certificate relates to articles filed with the Commission or a statement filed with the Commission pursuant to Article 16 (§

13.1-1088

et seq.) and the articles or statement states that the certificate shall become effective at a later time or date specified in the articles or statement. In that event, the certificate shall become effective at the earlier of the time and date so specified or 11:59 p.m. on the fifteenth day after the date on which the certificate is issued by the Commission. If a delayed effective date is specified, but no time is specified, the effective time shall be 12:01 a.m. on the date specified. Any other document filed with the Commission shall be effective when accepted for filing unless otherwise provided for in this chapter.
D. 1. A certificate issued by the Commission is effective at the time such certificate is issued, unless the certificate relates to articles filed with the Commission or a statement filed with the Commission pursuant to Article 16 (§

13.1-1088

et seq.) and the articles or statement states that the certificate shall become effective at a later time or date specified in the articles or statement. In that event, the certificate shall become effective at the earlier of the time and date so specified or 11:59 p.m. on the fifteenth day after the date on which the certificate is issued by the Commission. If a delayed effective date is specified, but no time is specified, the effective time shall be 12:01 a.m. on the date specified. Any other document filed with the Commission shall be effective when accepted for filing unless otherwise provided for in this chapter.

Notwithstanding subdivision 1, any certificate that has a delayed effective time or date shall not become effective if, prior to the effective time and date, a statement of cancellation signed by each party to the articles or statement to which the certificate relates is delivered to the Commission for filing. If the Commission finds that the statement of cancellation complies with the requirements of law, it shall, by order, cancel the certificate.

A statement of cancellation shall contain:

The name of the limited liability company;

The name of the articles or statement and the date on which the articles or statement were filed with the Commission;

The time and date on which the Commission’s certificate becomes effective; and

A statement that the articles or statement are being canceled in accordance with this section.

Notwithstanding subdivision 1, for purposes of §§

13.1-1012

,

13.1-1054

, and

13.1-1096

, any certificate that has a delayed effective date shall be deemed to be effective when the certificate is issued.

For articles or a statement with a delayed effective date and time, the effective date and time shall be Eastern Time.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Commission shall have the power to act upon a petition filed by a limited liability company or protected series at any time to correct Commission records so as to eliminate the effects of clerical errors and of filings made by a person without authority to act for the limited liability company.

History.

1991, c. 168; 1996, c. 265; 2010, c. 703; 2019, c. 636; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 636, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection B, inserted “or a protected series” and “or certificate of protected series designation”; in subdivision D 1, substituted “or a statement filed with the Commission pursuant to Article 16 (§

13.1-1088

et seq.) and the articles or statement states” for “and the articles state,” and inserted “or statement” at the end of the first sentence; in subdivision D 2, inserted “or statement” following “parties to the articles”; in subdivision D 3, inserted “and

13.1-1096

”; in subsection E, inserted “or protected series”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, in subdivision D 1, substituted “or date” for “and date” and inserted the penultimate sentence; rewrote subdivision D 2, which read: “Notwithstanding subdivision 1, any certificate that has a delayed effective time and date shall not become effective if, prior to the effective time and date, the parties to the articles or statement to which the certificate relates file a request for cancellation with the Commission, and the Commission, by order, cancels the certificate”; and added new subdivisions D 3 and 5 and redesignated former subdivision D 3 as subdivision D 4. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 13.1-1005.
Fees.

The Commission shall charge and collect the following fees:

For filing any one of the following, the fee shall be $100:

Articles of organization.

An application for registration as a foreign limited liability company.

Articles of entity conversion to convert a limited liability company to a domestic business trust or to convert a domestic partnership or limited partnership to a limited liability company.

Articles of domestication.

A statement of protected series designation.

An application for registration as a foreign protected series.

A copy of an instrument of entity conversion of a foreign limited liability company holding a certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth.

Articles of restatement.

Articles of organization surrender.

An application for a certificate of cancellation to cancel a certificate of registration as a foreign limited liability company.

A statement of designation change pursuant to §

13.1-1095

or

13.1-1096

.

A statement of designation cancellation.

An application for a certificate of cancellation to cancel a certificate of registration as a foreign protected series.

For filing any one of the following, the fee shall be $25:

For filing any one of the following, the fee shall be $10:

For issuing a certificate pursuant to §

13.1-1067

or

13.1-1099

, $6 for each certificate.

a.

Articles of amendment.

b.

Articles of cancellation.

c.

Articles of correction referred to in §

13.1-1011.1

, a copy of an amendment or correction referred to in §

13.1-1055

, or an amended application for registration referred to in §

13.1-1055

, provided that an amended application shall not require a separate fee when it is filed with a copy of an amendment or a correction referred to in § 13.1-1055.

d.

A copy of an instrument of merger of a foreign limited liability company referred to in §

13.1-1060

.

e.

Articles of merger.

f.

Articles of entity conversion to convert a limited liability company to a domestic corporation, in addition to a charter fee ascertained in accordance with §

13.1-615.1

.

a.

An application to reserve or to renew the reservation of a name for use by a domestic or foreign limited liability company.

b.

A notice of the transfer of a name reserved for use by a domestic or a foreign limited liability company.

History.

1991, c. 168; 1992, cc. 574, 575; 1993, c. 113; 1995, c. 368; 1998, c. 432; 2001, c. 545; 2002, c. 1; 2003, c. 379; 2004, c. 274; 2005, c. 255; 2006, cc. 748, 912; 2007, c. 810; 2008, c. 108; 2012, c. 130; 2019, c. 636; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 3 provides: “That until July 1, 2023, the term ‘incorporation surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 10 (§

13.1-801

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia, the term ‘organization surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 12 (§

13.1-1000

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia, and the term ‘trust surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 14 (§

13.1-1200

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia shall also be construed to mean ‘domestication,’ and the term ‘entity conversion’ when used in any provision of Chapter 10, 12, or 14 of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia shall also be construed to mean ‘conversion.’ ”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 636, effective July 1, 2021, in subdivision 1, substituted “a limited liability company to a domestic business trust or to convert a domestic partnership or limited partnership to a limited liability company” for “a domestic corporation to a limited liability company” in subdivision 1 c and added subdivisions 1 e and f; in subdivision 2, inserted subdivisions 2 f and k through m, and in subdivision 2 j., substituted “to cancel a certificate of registration as a” for “of a”; in subdivision 3, added “or any protected series thereof” at the end of subdivisions 3 a and b; and in subdivision 4, inserted “or

13.1-1099

.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, in subdivisions 3 a and b, deleted “or any protected series thereof” at the end of each. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 13.1-1006.
Penalty for signing false documents.

It shall be unlawful for any person to sign a document he knows is false in any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the Commission for filing.

Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be guilty of Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1991, c. 168.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12A M.J. Limited Liability Companies, § 8.